Massachusetts, session 194th, S2364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 161A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 52 the following new section:-
Section 53. Commuter rail service fares
Section 1. The General Manager of the Metropolitan Boston Transit Agency (“MBTA”)
shall create fare structure for the MBTA commuter rail designed to increase ridership among
residents of transit-oriented areas, including but not limited to the consideration of the following
fare structure:
(f) A $10 all-inclusive weekday fare comparable to the existing $10 weekend and holiday
fare;
(g) One-way fares not to surpass three times the regular subway fare;
of 2

(h) Monthly passes priced for hybrid workers, for example those who commute three
days per week rather than five days per week;
(i) Discounts for purchasing multiple rides, for example a 10- or 12-pack;
(j) Reducing the number of commuter rail zones and simplifying overall fare pricing;
(k) Off-setting ticket price reductions with increased parking rates.
Section 2. Within 12 months of enactment, the General Manager of the MBTA shall
submit recommendations for these and other possibilities to the Governor and the Legislature,
along with estimates for the impact on ridership.
Section 3. Within 24 months of enactment, the General Manager of the MBTA shall
execute pilot programs to test the implementation and impact on commuter rail ridership based
on the recommendations in section 1.
of 2